Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202481-152
Materiel division; established; duties; materiel administrator; branches; established.

The materiel division of the Department of Administrative Services is hereby established and shall be managed by the materiel administrator.

There are hereby established the following seven branches of the materiel division of the Department of Administrative Services which shall have the following duties, powers, and responsibilities:

(1) The office supplies bureau shall be responsible for providing office supplies, paper, and forms to state agencies other than the University of Nebraska or the Nebraska state colleges;

(2) Central mail shall be responsible for all mailing operations, transportation of material, tracking shipments, and making freight claims;

(3) The print shop shall be responsible for specifications and for receiving bids and placing orders to the lowest and best commercial bidder for all printing and reproduction operations for the state. The print shop shall also be responsible for coordinating all existing printing and reproduction operations of the state;

(4) Copy services shall be responsible for the purchasing and placement of all copier requirements;

(5) The state purchasing bureau shall be responsible for all purchases of personal property by all state agencies other than the University of Nebraska or the Nebraska state colleges;

(6) The state recycling office shall be responsible for the administration and operation of the State Government Recycling Management Act; and

(7) State surplus property shall be responsible for the disposition of the state's surplus property and the maintenance of all inventory records.

Laws 1965, c. 538, § 18, p. 1705;

Laws 1969, c. 780, § 4, p. 2955;

Laws 1974, LB 1054, § 32;

Laws 1975, LB 359, § 14;

Laws 1975, LB 447, § 8;

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 29;

Laws 1992, LB 1241, § 27;

Laws 1997, LB 314, § 11;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 24;

Laws 2000, LB 654, § 26;

Laws 2003, LB 626, § 10;

Laws 2017, LB151, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB320, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 105;

R.S.Supp.,2023, § 81-1118;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 34.
July 19, 2024
State Government Recycling Management Act, see section 81-1183.